Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2792 DIVISION I 1 REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 2 Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ 3 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following 5 state entities for the following fiscal years, the following 6 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 9 For maintenance projects at the Terrace Hill facility: 10 FY 2026-2027: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 13 a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund 14 created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the 15 water quality initiative administered by the division of soil 16 conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , 17 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph 19 âcâ: 20 FY 2026-2027: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 22 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered 23 paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in 24 subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part 25 of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources 26 coordinating council. 27 (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 28 shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds 29 generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the 30 division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water 31 resources coordinating council. 32 (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds 33 as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: 34 (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality 35 -1- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 22 H.F. 2792 practices as described in the latest revision of the document 1 entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented 2 in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land 3 stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa 4 state university of science and technology. 5 (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects 6 as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing 7 for participation by persons who hold a legal interest 8 in agricultural land used in farming. To every extent 9 practicable, the division shall provide for collaborative 10 participation by such persons who hold a legal interest in 11 agricultural land located within the same subwatershed. 12 (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on 13 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for 14 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall 15 not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the 16 practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the 17 actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. 18 (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate 19 other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing 20 similar water quality practices. The division shall promote 21 field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to 22 establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural 23 land. 24 (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 25 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 26 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 27 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 28 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 29 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 30 land shall be a confidential record. 31 (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 32 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner 33 that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in 34 agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality 35 -2- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 22 H.F. 2792 practices, including the establishment of such practices in 1 watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or 2 high-priority watersheds. 3 (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 4 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the 5 implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. 6 (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 7 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water 8 conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited 9 to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, 10 the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality 11 restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share 12 basis as provided in chapter 161A . 13 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 14 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this 15 lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered 16 paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other 17 moneys available to the department from a state or federal 18 source. 19 (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 20 this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration 21 and implementation of the water quality initiative administered 22 by the division. 23 b. (1) For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling 24 system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, 25 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 26 FY 2026-2027: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 28 (2) Any information received, collected, or held for 29 purposes of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record 30 exempt from public release if the information identifies a 31 person who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who 32 has previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, 33 a person who is involved or who was previously involved in 34 managing the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock 35 -3- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 3/ 22 H.F. 2792 on the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the 1 agricultural land. 2 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 3 For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth 4 Street, Des Moines, Iowa: 5 FY 2026-2027: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 7 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 8 For conducting a study to determine the anticipated costs 9 associated with installing air conditioning at the Mount 10 Pleasant correctional facility, notwithstanding section 8.57, 11 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2026-2027: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 67,000 14 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 15 a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism 16 fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, 17 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 18 FY 2026-2027: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 20 b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in 21 section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 22 paragraph âcâ: 23 FY 2026-2027: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 25 c. For grants to nonprofit organizations committed to 26 strengthening communities through youth development, healthy 27 living, and social responsibility for costs associated with 28 the renovation and maintenance of facility infrastructure at 29 facilities located in cities with a population of less than 30 28,000 according to the 2020 federal decennial census: 31 FY 2026-2027: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 33 d. For deposit in the strategic infrastructure program fund 34 described in section 15.313, notwithstanding section 8.57, 35 -4- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 4/ 22 H.F. 2792 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 1 FY 2026-2027: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 3 e. For deposit in the local government shared-services 4 grant fund established in section 28E.20, if enacted by 2026 5 Iowa Acts, Senate Study Bill 3034, section 95, 2026 Iowa Acts, 6 House Study Bill 563, section 95, or successor legislation, 7 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 8 FY 2026-2027: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 10 f. For a grant to a nonprofit organization located in a city 11 with a population between 2,000 and 3,000 according to the 2020 12 federal decennial census, for the final construction costs of 13 a presidential library: 14 FY 2026-2027: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 g. For equal distribution to regional sports authority 17 districts certified by the authority pursuant to section 18 15E.321, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph 19 âcâ: 20 FY 2026-2027: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 22 h. For providing financial assistance to a city or 23 nonprofit organization hosting the national junior olympics, 24 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 25 FY 2026-2027: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 27 i. For providing a grant to the entity in possession of 28 the U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) for maintaining the battleshipâs deck, 29 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 30 FY 2026-2027: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 32 FY 2027-2028: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 34 FY 2028-2029: 35 -5- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 5/ 22 H.F. 2792 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 1 FY 2029-2030: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 3 6. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 4 For conducting a study to determine the anticipated costs 5 associated with repairing the roof of the Giangreco building 6 and for related design costs, notwithstanding section 8.57, 7 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 8 FY 2026-2027: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 10 7. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY 11 For construction of a firearms range at Camp Dodge: 12 FY 2026-2027: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,700,000 14 8. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 15 a. For implementation of lake projects that have 16 established watershed improvement initiatives and community 17 support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake 18 restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, 19 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 20 FY 2026-2027: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 22 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: 23 FY 2026-2027: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 25 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, 26 including grants for projects relating to eligible water 27 bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 28 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 29 FY 2026-2027: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 31 d. For providing funding assistance to eligible 32 communities, as described in section 455E.11, subsection 2, 33 paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), 34 to address abandoned buildings by promoting waste abatement, 35 -6- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 6/ 22 H.F. 2792 diversion, selective dismantlement of building components, 1 and recycling, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 2 paragraph âcâ: 3 FY 2026-2027: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 5 e. (1) For increasing the capacity to park vehicles at 6 designated parking areas in state parks, notwithstanding 7 section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 8 FY 2026-2027: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 10 (2) The department of natural resources shall prioritize 11 adding the highest total number of additional parking spaces 12 at designated parking areas in state parks regardless of the 13 material used for the designated parking areas, including but 14 not limited to gravel. 15 9. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 16 a. For major maintenance projects at national guard 17 armories and facilities: 18 FY 2026-2027: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 20 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard 21 installations and readiness centers to support operations and 22 training requirements: 23 FY 2026-2027: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 25 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge 26 facility: 27 FY 2026-2027: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 29 d. For repairing, improving, and replacing, as applicable, 30 the runway in Sioux City used by the 185th air refueling wing: 31 FY 2026-2027: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 33 e. The department of public defense shall report to the 34 general assembly by December 15, 2026, regarding the projects 35 -7- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 7/ 22 H.F. 2792 the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys 1 appropriated to the department pursuant to paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 2 and âcâ. 3 10. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 4 For payments and other costs due under a financing agreement 5 entered into by the treasurer of state for building the 6 statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to 7 section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, 8 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 9 FY 2026-2027: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,846,011 11 11. BOARD OF REGENTS 12 a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the 13 state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science 14 and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to 15 reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating 16 funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees 17 and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of 18 providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities 19 and utility services at the institutions: 20 FY 2026-2027: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000,000 22 b. For renovation and construction of the public policy 23 center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: 24 FY 2026-2027: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 26 FY 2027-2028: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 28 FY 2028-2029: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 30 c. For renovation and construction of the nursing 31 simulation laboratory at the state university of Iowa: 32 FY 2026-2027: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 34 FY 2027-2028: 35 -8- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 8/ 22 H.F. 2792 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 1 FY 2028-2029: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 3 12. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 4 a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational 5 trails within the state: 6 FY 2026-2027: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 8 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant 9 fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet 10 the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, 11 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2026-2027: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,200,000 14 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant 15 fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, 16 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 17 FY 2026-2027: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 19 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at commercial 20 service airports within the state: 21 FY 2026-2027: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,900,000 23 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general 24 aviation airports within the state: 25 FY 2026-2027: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 27 f. For matching the funding requirements necessary to 28 receive federal grants awarded to improve public transit by 29 replacing vehicles and constructing or expanding vehicle 30 facilities, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 31 paragraph âcâ: 32 FY 2026-2027: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,300,000 34 g. For deposit in the railway tracks overpass and underpass 35 -9- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 9/ 22 H.F. 2792 fund created in section 307.19, if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, 1 House File 882, section 1, or successor legislation: 2 FY 2026-2027: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 4 FY 2027-2028: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 6 FY 2028-2029: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 8 FY 2029-2030: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 10 FY 2030-2031: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 12 13. TREASURER OF STATE 13 For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified 14 fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county 15 fair vertical infrastructure improvements: 16 FY 2026-2027: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 18 14. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS 19 For repairing, improving, and replacing, as applicable, 20 sidewalks at the Iowa veterans home: 21 FY 2026-2027: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 180,000 23 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 24 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 25 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 26 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 27 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 28 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 29 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 30 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 31 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 32 the close of that same fiscal year. 33 Sec. 3. Section 2.12B, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -10- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 10/ 22 H.F. 2792 2. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 1 infrastructure fund for deposit in the state capitol 2 maintenance fund, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018 3 2026 , and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of five 4 seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. 5 DIVISION II 6 TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND 7 Sec. 4. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND ââ 8 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the technology 9 reinvestment fund created in section 8.57C to the following 10 state entities for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 11 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 12 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 13 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 14 For technology projects and upgrades: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 697,425 16 2. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 17 a. (1) For the continued development and implementation 18 of an educational data warehouse that will be utilized by 19 teachers, parents, school district administrators, area 20 education agency staff, department of education staff, and 21 policymakers: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 23 (2) Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 24 the department may use a portion for an e-transcript data 25 system capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ 26 education via interconnectivity with multiple schools. 27 b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with 28 connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 30 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 31 a. For costs associated with implementing Medicaid work 32 requirements, new eligibility redetermination requirements, 33 and required information technology changes pursuant to 34 federal Pub. L. No. 119-21, commonly referred to as the One Big 35 -11- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 11/ 22 H.F. 2792 Beautiful Bill Act: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,473,690 2 b. For technology costs associated with the state poison 3 control center: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,080 5 4. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 6 For the continuing implementation of a statewide mass 7 notification and emergency messaging system: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 9 5. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT 10 a. For the continued development and implementation of 11 a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for 12 budget and financial information: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 14 b. For the continued development and implementation of the 15 comprehensive electronic grant management system: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 17 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and 18 property tax system: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 20 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is 21 placed on the internet for budget and financial information: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 23 e. For the security office of the chief information 24 officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and 25 response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and 26 miscellaneous purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 28 f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the 29 continued development and implementation of the Iowa integrated 30 justice system: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 32 g. For costs associated with the justice enterprise data 33 warehouse: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 35 -12- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 12/ 22 H.F. 2792 h. For costs associated with the enterprise artificial 1 intelligence capacity expansion: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,510,000 3 i. For costs associated with the modernization of the 4 mobile architecture and communications handling program and the 5 traffic and criminal software program: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 7 6. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 8 For costs associated with a new digital evidence management 9 system: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 11 7. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 12 For costs associated with motor vehicle division systems 13 modernization: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,000,000 15 8. TREASURER OF STATE 16 a. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for 17 investment tracking: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 19 b. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for 20 banking reconciliations: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 22 Sec. 5. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 23 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 24 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 25 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 26 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 27 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 28 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 29 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 30 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 31 the close of that same fiscal year. 32 Sec. 6. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of 35 -13- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 13/ 22 H.F. 2792 the state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal 1 year beginning July 1, 2026 2027 , and for each fiscal year 2 thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred thousand 3 dollars. 4 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 5 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 6 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , the sum of eighteen 7 million two hundred sixty-nine thousand two hundred seventeen 8 thirty-seven million two hundred ninety-one thousand six 9 hundred forty-one dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, 10 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 11 DIVISION III 12 CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS 13 Sec. 7. 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 2, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 16 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 17 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 18 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 19 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 20 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 21 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 22 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 23 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 24 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 25 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 26 fiscal year. 27 2. For purposes of section 8.33, unencumbered or 28 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 29 subsection 12, paragraph âfâ, of this 2023 Iowa Act shall not 30 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 31 purposes designated until December 31, 2026. 32 Sec. 8. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 1, subsection 33 1, paragraph b, subparagraph (1), as amended by 2025 Iowa Acts, 34 chapter 167, section 14, is amended to read as follows: 35 -14- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 14/ 22 H.F. 2792 (1) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the 1 department of administrative services shall allocate and use 2 the moneys necessary to improve and repair the steps on the 3 west side of the exterior of the capitol building and for 4 projects on the east side of the exterior of the capitol 5 building, as directed by the legislative branch, by the close 6 of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2025 October 31, 2026 . 7 Sec. 9. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 2, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 10 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 11 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 12 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 13 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 14 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 15 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 16 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 17 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 18 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 19 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 20 fiscal year. 21 2. For purposes of section 8.33, unencumbered or 22 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made for the fiscal 23 year beginning July 1, 2024, in section 1, subsection 5, 24 paragraphs âbâ, âdâ, and âeâ, of this 2024 Iowa Act shall not 25 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 26 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 27 ends three years after the end of the fiscal year for which 28 the appropriation was made, or until the project for which the 29 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 30 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 31 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 32 DIVISION IV 33 RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 34 Sec. 11. STANDING APPROPRIATION ââ FY 2026-2027. In 35 -15- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 15/ 22 H.F. 2792 lieu of the appropriation provided in section 159A.17, the 1 appropriation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 2 ending June 30, 2027, from the general fund of the state to the 3 renewable fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 4 for the fiscal year is zero. 5 DIVISION V 6 REGIONAL SPORTS AUTHORITY DISTRICTS ââ FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE 7 ELIGIBILITY 8 Sec. 12. Section 15E.321, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 15E.321 Regional sports authority districts. 11 1. As used in this section , âdistrictâ : 12 a. âDistrictâ means a regional sports authority district 13 certified under this section . 14 b. âEntityâ means an Iowa nonprofit organization established 15 to promote economic development and tourism in an area within 16 the state. 17 2. a. A convention and visitors bureau An entity may 18 apply to the authority for certification of a regional sports 19 authority district which may include more than one city 20 and more than one convention and visitors bureau within the 21 district and for financial assistance . The authority shall not 22 certify more than ten such districts. 23 b. If more than ten applications are received in any 24 certification year, the The authority shall certify the 25 districts on a competitive basis. In evaluating the 26 applications an application for certification and financial 27 assistance , the authority shall consider the economic impact to 28 the activities proposed in the application provide to the state 29 of the activities proposed in the application , the geographic 30 diversity of the districts applying, the number of unique and 31 innovative activities proposed to be supported by the district, 32 and any other factors the authority deems relevant. 33 3. Each district shall actively promote youth sports, high 34 school athletic activities, the special olympics, and other 35 -16- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 16/ 22 H.F. 2792 nonprofessional physical sporting events in the local area. 1 4. Each district may apply for and receive financial 2 assistance under the sports tourism program established by the 3 authority pursuant to section 15F.401 . 4 5. Each district shall be governed by a seven-member board 5 consisting of seven members appointed by the convention and 6 visitors bureau filing the application pursuant to subsection 7 2 . At least three members of the board shall consist of city 8 council members of any cities located in the district. Each 9 board shall be responsible for administering programs designed 10 to promote the activities enumerated in subsection 3 . A 11 district that received financial assistance from the authority 12 for an activity described in an application submitted pursuant 13 to subsection 2 shall submit a comprehensive report to the 14 authority not more than thirty days after the final date of the 15 activity, unless a later date is approved in writing by the 16 authority. The comprehensive report must detail the return 17 on investment, number of first-time visitors to the state, 18 and total number of hotel rooms occupied as a result of the 19 activity. The authority may request additional information if 20 the authority deems it necessary to evaluate an activity. 21 DIVISION VI 22 HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 23 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 24 LIMITATION ON OBLIGATION OF MONEYS ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 25 MODERNIZATION STUDY COMMITTEE. 26 1. Limitation on obligation of moneys. 27 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and notwithstanding 28 any other provision of law to the contrary, for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2026, the department of health and human 30 services shall not enter into, amend, or extend a contract, 31 purchase order, interagency agreement, or other financial 32 obligation that will cost more than five million dollars, 33 individually or collectively, or commit the state to multiyear 34 financial obligations. This limitation applies to major 35 -17- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 17/ 22 H.F. 2792 information technology system replacement, redevelopment, 1 or modernization, including but not limited to eligibility, 2 benefits administration, child welfare, child support, child 3 care, and Medicaid administration systems. 4 b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to information technology 5 changes that are necessary solely to comply with federal Pub. 6 L. No. 119-21, commonly referred to as the One Big Beautiful 7 Bill Act, or state or federal law enacted to implement a 8 provision of Pub. L. No. 119-21, if such law expressly requires 9 near-term implementation and the changes do not materially 10 advance broader system modernization or system replacement 11 efforts beyond what is minimally required to comply with the 12 applicable law. 13 2. Study committee. 14 a. The department of health and human services, in 15 consultation with the legislative services agency and the 16 department of management, shall establish an information 17 technology modernization study committee on or before August 18 1, 2026, and the study committee shall conduct a comprehensive 19 review of the department of health and human servicesâ 20 information technology systems, data architecture, and 21 modernization strategy. 22 b. The study committee must include but is not limited to 23 all of the following members: 24 (1) One or more persons familiar with the information 25 technology division and program division of the department of 26 health and human services, appointed by the director of health 27 and human services. 28 (2) One or more persons from the legislative services 29 agency, appointed by the director of the legislative services 30 agency. 31 (3) One or more persons from the division of information 32 technology of the department of management, appointed by the 33 director of the department of management. 34 c. The study committee must include all of the following ex 35 -18- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 18/ 22 H.F. 2792 officio members: 1 (1) Three members of the senate, two appointed by the 2 majority leader of the senate and one appointed by the minority 3 leader of the senate. 4 (2) Three members of the house of representatives, two 5 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives 6 and one appointed by the minority leader of the house of 7 representatives. 8 d. The committee may invite other persons to participate 9 in committee meetings, including but not limited to persons 10 from private sector firms, academic experts, and subject matter 11 experts with demonstrated experience in large-scale system 12 integration, data governance, fraud detection, and artificial 13 intelligence-enabled platforms. 14 e. The study committee shall examine all major information 15 technology systems currently used by the department of health 16 and human services, including legacy systems and recently 17 implemented platforms, and shall do all of the following: 18 (1) Identify redundancies, fragmentations, and 19 interoperability gaps among systems. 20 (2) Assess the departmentâs current ability to integrate 21 data across programs and databases to detect errors, waste, 22 fraud, and abuse. 23 (3) Evaluate options for developing or procuring a unified 24 integrated architecture system capable of securely linking 25 program databases and supporting advanced analytics and 26 automation. 27 (4) Consider existing vendors supporting the departmentâs 28 current systems and alternative solutions offered by firms and 29 experts specializing in modern, artificial intelligence-first, 30 or cloud-native system design. 31 (5) Identify governance, procurement, and oversight 32 structures necessary to ensure cost control, transparency, and 33 long-term sustainability. 34 f. The study committee shall prioritize identifying a 35 -19- LSB 5008HV (2) 91 th/ns 19/ 22 H.F. 2792 long-term solution that integrates department of health and 1 human services databases across programs and enables timely 2 detection of eligibility errors, improper payments, and 3 fraudulent activity while reducing duplicative administrative 4 processes. 5 g. The department of health and human services shall submit 6 a report to the general assembly and the governor on or before 7 January 1, 2027. The report must include the study committeeâs 8 findings, recommended statutory or budgetary changes, estimated 9 costs and timelines, and options for phased implementation. 10 3. Repeal. This section is repealed July 1, 2027. 11